Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.350

Director may require reserve fund by order—Actions against a registration.

(1) If the purchaser will own or acquire title to specified real property or improvements to be acquired by the camping resort, the director may by order require to the extent necessary to protect the interests of the purchasers or owners of camping resort contracts, that an appropriate portion of the proceeds paid under those camping resort contracts be placed in a separate reserve fund to be set aside and applied toward the purchase price of the real property, improvements, or facilities.

(2) The director may take any of the actions authorized in RCW 18.235.110 against a registration in which the registrant is advertising or offering annual or periodic dues or assessments by members that the director finds would result in the registrant's future inability to fund operating costs.

[ 2002 c 86 s 272; 1988 c 159 s 10; 1982 c 69 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.